Rhode Island statutes. Title 21 Food and Drugs
Chapter 17 Eggs

21-17-1.
Shell eggs — Labeling as to grade and size.

All shell eggs sold or offered for sale in this state for human consumption shall be labeled with the grade and size designation as set forth in the Rhode Island consumer grades.

History of Section.

G.L. 1938, ch. 211, § 1; P.L. 1947, ch. 1880, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

21-17-1

.

21-17-2.
Consumer grades — Regulations.

The Rhode Island consumer grades for shell eggs shall be designated AA-A-B-C. The standards for quality of individual eggs shall be established by the director of environmental management under the provisions of §

21-20-5

and shall apply to all shell eggs sold or offered for sale. The means used in determining these grades and standards shall be specified by regulation issued by the director of environmental management.

History of Section.

G.L. 1938, ch. 211, § 2; P.L. 1947, ch. 1880, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

21-17-2

; impl. am. P.L. 1965, ch. 137, § 1; P.L. 1977, ch. 171, § 1.

21-17-3.
Establishment of size and weight classes.

The size and weight classes for all shell eggs sold or offered for sale in Rhode Island shall be established by the director of environmental management under the provisions of §

21-20-5

.

History of Section.

G.L. 1938, ch. 211, § 3; P.L. 1947, ch. 1880, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

21-17-3

; impl. am. P.L. 1965, ch. 137, § 1.

21-17-4.
Hearings on quality, weight, and size requirements.

Before establishing or changing the standards of quality, weight, and size requirements for Rhode Island consumer grades for shell eggs, the director shall hold a public hearing, notice of which shall be given in a newspaper of statewide circulation. The specifications for consumer grades and weight classes and the standards for quality of individual eggs shall be those promulgated by the U.S. Department of Agriculture as set forth in the regulations governing the grading of shell eggs and the U.S. standards, grades, and weight classes for shell eggs (7 CFR part 56).

History of Section.

G.L. 1938, ch. 211, § 9; P.L. 1947, ch. 1880, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

21-17-4

; P.L. 1977, ch. 171, § 1.

21-17-5.
Advertising — Containers — Invoices.

All advertising of shell eggs shall include the correct size and grade designation in describing the eggs and the correct size and grade designation shall appear in clearly legible letters on the top or side of the exterior of any container in which the eggs are offered for sale. An invoice stating both the correct size and the correct quality grade designations shall accompany each delivery of eggs to a retailer. The invoice shall also include the name and address of both buyer and seller, date of sale, and shall conform to regulations issued by the director of environmental management.

History of Section.

G.L. 1938, ch. 211, § 4; P.L. 1947, ch. 1880, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

21-17-5

; impl. am. P.L. 1965, ch. 137, § 1.

21-17-6.
Use of terms importing freshness.

The terms “fresh eggs,” “strictly fresh eggs,” “new-laid eggs,” or words or descriptions of similar import shall not be used in connection with the sale or offering for sale or advertising for sale of eggs in Rhode Island that do not meet the minimum requirements for Rhode Island consumer grade A or better.

History of Section.

P.L. 1936, ch. 2354, § 1; G.L. 1938, ch. 211, § 1; G.L. 1938, ch. 211, § 5; P.L. 1947, ch. 1880, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

21-17-6

; P.L. 1977, ch. 171, § 1.

21-17-7.
False representations as to grade or size — Sale of inedible eggs.

No person, firm, or corporation shall falsely advertise, falsely label, or falsely represent in any manner the grade or size of eggs sold or offered for sale in Rhode Island. The sale of inedible eggs for human consumption as defined under the federal Food, Drug, and Cosmetic Act, 21 U.S.C. § 301 et seq., is prohibited. The sale of restricted eggs as defined by the federal Egg Products Inspection Act, 21 U.S.C. § 1031 et seq., is prohibited to retailers.

History of Section.

G.L. 1938, ch. 211, § 6; P.L. 1947, ch. 1880, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

21-17-7

; P.L. 1977, ch. 171, § 1.

21-17-8.
Exemption of sales by producers.

All eggs intended for sale to a first receiver who normally grades them into proper sizes and grades before reselling them shall be exempt from the provisions of §§

21-17-1

—

21-17-10

until they are offered for resale.

History of Section.

G.L. 1938, ch. 211, § 7; P.L. 1947, ch. 1880, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

21-17-8

.

21-17-9.
Enforcement — Appropriations.

The director of environmental management shall administer and enforce the provisions of §§

21-17-1

—

21-17-10

, and shall make suitable regulations to carry out the administration and enforcement. The general assembly shall annually appropriate any sum that it may deem necessary to carry out the purposes of §§

21-17-1

—

21-17-10

.

History of Section.

P.L. 1936, ch. 2354, § 5; G.L. 1938, ch. 211, § 5; G.L. 1938, ch. 211, § 8; P.L. 1947, ch. 1880, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

21-17-9

; impl. am. P.L. 1965, ch. 137, § 1.

21-17-10.
Penalties for violations.

Any person, firm, or corporation, which by itself, or its agents or employees, violates any provisions of §§

21-17-1

—

21-17-10

, or any regulation made pursuant to those sections, or fails to comply with any of the requirements of those sections or knowingly misrepresents the condition, size, or quality of any eggs, shall be fined not more than fifty dollars ($50.00) for the first offense and not more than two hundred dollars ($200) for each subsequent offense. Complaints for the violation of the provisions of §§

21-17-1

—

21-17-10

may be made by any person, and if made by the director or a duly authorized agent, the director or agent shall be exempt from giving surety for costs on that complaint.

History of Section.

P.L. 1936, ch. 2354, § 7; G.L. 1938, ch. 211, § 7; G.L. 1938, ch. 211, § 10; P.L. 1947, ch. 1880, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

21-17-10

; P.L. 1977, ch. 171, § 1.

21-17-11.
“Cold storage eggs” defined.

“Cold storage eggs” as used in this chapter means eggs that have been artificially cooled for thirty (30) days or more at or below a temperature of forty degrees Fahrenheit (40 degrees F.), and no other eggs shall be sold as “cold storage eggs.”

History of Section.

P.L. 1915, ch. 1190, § 1; G.L. 1923, ch. 168, § 29; G.L. 1938, ch. 269, § 23; G.L. 1956, §

21-17-11

.

21-17-12.
Labeling of cold storage eggs.

Whenever “cold storage eggs” are sold at wholesale or retail, or offered or exposed for sale, the case, package, box, or other container in which the eggs are placed or delivered shall be marked plainly and conspicuously with the words “cold storage eggs,” or there shall be attached to the container a placard or sign having on it those words. If “cold storage eggs” are sold at retail or offered or exposed for sale without a container or placed upon a counter or elsewhere, a sign or placard having the words “cold storage eggs” plainly and conspicuously marked upon it shall be displayed in, upon, or immediately above the eggs; the display of the words “cold storage eggs” as required by this chapter shall be in letters not less than one inch (1") in height and shall be done in the manner that is approved by the department of health.

History of Section.

P.L. 1915, ch. 1190, § 2; G.L. 1923, ch. 168, § 30; G.L. 1938, ch. 269, § 24; impl. am. P.L. 1939, ch. 660, § 180; G.L. 1956, §

21-17-12

.

21-17-13.
Penalty for violations.

Any person, firm, or corporation violating any of the provisions of §

21-17-12

shall be punished by a fine of not less than ten dollars ($10.00), nor more than one hundred dollars ($100), for each offense.

History of Section.

P.L. 1915, ch. 1190, § 3; G.L. 1923, ch. 168, § 31; G.L. 1938, ch. 269, § 25; G.L. 1956, §

21-17-13

.

21-17-14.
Rules and regulations — Enforcement.

The department of health shall have the same duties and powers relative to the making of rules and regulations relative to the enforcement of §

21-17-12

as is or shall be conferred upon it by chapter 1 of this title with reference to other foods.

History of Section.

P.L. 1915, ch. 1190, § 4; G.L. 1923, ch. 168, § 32; G.L. 1938, ch. 269, § 26; impl. am. P.L. 1939, ch. 660, § 180; G.L. 1956, §

21-17-14

.

21-17-15.
Complaints for violations.

Complaints for the violation of the provisions of §

21-17-12

may be made by any person, and if made by the director or a duly authorized agent of the director of health, the director or agent shall be exempt from giving surety for costs on that complaint.

History of Section.

P.L. 1915, ch. 1190, § 5; G.L. 1923, ch. 168, § 33; G.L. 1938, ch. 269, § 27; impl. am. P.L. 1939, ch. 660, § 180; G.L. 1956, §

21-17-15

.